South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3627.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 43, Title 27 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 27-43-320. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is unlawful to prohibit an individual from gaining access to a cemetery, burial ground, or grave that is located on private property. An individual who is found to be in violation of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, for each offense must be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars or imprisoned for not less than ten days nor more than thirty days, in the discretion of the court. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----